Louisiana, session 2026, SB202.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:423(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§423. Parish boards of election supervisors
* * *
E. Compensation. Each member of the parish board of election supervisors
shall receive one hundred fifty dollars for each day, not to exceed six seven days,
actually spent in the performance of his duties in preparing for and supervising each
election held in the parish, except that each member of the board may be
compensated for not more than eight nine days for a presidential or regularly
scheduled or special congressional primary or general election. In addition, each
member of the board who is not a public official shall receive fifty dollars for each
day spent in court as a subpoenaed witness in litigation concerning the performance
of his duties as a member of the parish board of election supervisors in connection
with an election.
* * *
Section 2.(A) The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective when
an Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for the
implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
(B) The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 202 ENROLLED
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.